Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article I. Bill of Rights.

A DECLARATION OF RIGHTS made by the good people of Virginia in the exercise of their sovereign powers, which rights do pertain to them and their posterity, as the basis and foundation of government.

§ 1. Equality and rights of men.

That all men are by nature equally free and independent and have certain inherent rights, of which, when they enter into a state of society, they cannot, by any compact, deprive or divest their posterity; namely, the enjoyment of life and liberty, with the means of acquiring and possessing property, and pursuing and obtaining happiness and safety.

Law Review.

For article on the general principles of constitutional adjudication, see 10 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 315 (1968).

For symposium on State constitutional revision, see 54 Va. L. Rev. 816 (1968).

For note on constitutional change, see 54 Va. L. Rev. 995 (1968).

For a jurisprudential view of the right to keep and bear arms, see 4 G.M.U. L. Rev. 1 (1981).

For a re-examination of sovereign tort immunity in Virginia, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 247 (1981).

For article on state constitutional law processes, see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 169 (1983).

For note, “The Extraterritorial Application of the Constitution — Unalienable Rights?,” see 72 Va. L. Rev. 649 (1986).

For an article, “Identity and Interpretation in State Constitutional Law,” see 84 Va. L. Rev. 389 (1998).

For annual survey essay, “A Vanishing Virginia Constitution?,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 347 (2011).

For comment, “Commonwealth and Constitution,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 415 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 79;
12A M.J. Licenses, § 11.

§ 2. People the source of power.

That all power is vested in, and consequently derived from, the people, that magistrates are their trustees and servants, and at all times amenable to them.

§ 3. Government instituted for common benefit.

That government is, or ought to be, instituted for the common benefit, protection, and security of the people, nation, or community; of all the various modes and forms of government, that is best which is capable of producing the greatest degree of happiness and safety, and is most effectually secured against the danger of maladministration; and, whenever any government shall be found inadequate or contrary to these purposes, a majority of the community hath an indubitable, inalienable, and indefeasible right to reform, alter, or abolish it, in such manner as shall be judged most conducive to the public weal.

Law Review.

For comment, “Commonwealth and Constitution,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 415 (2013).

§ 4. No exclusive emoluments or privileges; offices not to be hereditary.

That no man, or set of men, is entitled to exclusive or separate emoluments or privileges from the community, but in consideration of public services; which not being descendible, neither ought the offices of magistrate, legislator, or judge to be hereditary.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
4C M.J. Constitutional Law, §§ 39, 82.

§ 5. Separation of legislative, executive, and judicial departments; periodical elections.

That the legislative, executive, and judicial departments of the Commonwealth should be separate and distinct; and that the members thereof may be restrained from oppression, by feeling and participating the burthens of the people, they should, at fixed periods, be reduced to a private station, return into that body from which they were originally taken, and the vacancies be supplied by regular elections, in which all or any part of the former members shall be again eligible, or ineligible, as the laws may direct.

Cross references.

As to the legislative department, see Va. Const., Art. IV.

As to the executive department, see Va. Const., Art. V.

As to the judiciary department, see Va. Const., Art. VI.

Law Review.

For note discussing the separation of powers aspects of service by legislators on administrative boards, see 40 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 171 (1983).

For annual survey essay, “A Vanishing Virginia Constitution?,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 347 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 25.

§ 6. Free elections; consent of governed.

That all elections ought to be free; and that all men, having sufficient evidence of permanent common interest with, and attachment to, the community, have the right of suffrage, and cannot be taxed, or deprived of, or damaged in, their property for public uses, without their own consent, or that of their representatives duly elected, or bound by any law to which they have not, in like manner, assented for the public good.

Cross references.

As to private property being taken or damaged for public uses, see Va. Const., Art. I, § 11.

As to qualification and registration of voters, see Va. Const., Art. II, and §

24.2-400

et seq.

Law Review.

For an article, “Redistricting in the Post-2000 Era,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 431 (2000).

For an article, “Down For the Count:
The Constitutional, Political and Policy Related Problems of Census Sampling,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 477 (2000).

For essay, “Marshall v. Northern Virginia Transportation Authority: The Supreme Court of Virginia Rules that Taxes Can Be Imposed By Elected Bodies Only,” see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 51 (2008).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 29;
18 M.J. Surface Transportation Systems, Streets and Highways, §§ 33, 106.

§ 7. Laws should not be suspended.

That all power of suspending laws, or the execution of laws, by any authority, without consent of the representatives of the people, is injurious to their rights, and ought not to be exercised.

§ 8. Criminal prosecutions.

That in criminal prosecutions a man hath a right to demand the cause and nature of his accusation, to be confronted with the accusers and witnesses, and to call for evidence in his favor, and he shall enjoy the right to a speedy and public trial, by an impartial jury of his vicinage, without whose unanimous consent he cannot be found guilty. He shall not be deprived of life or liberty, except by the law of the land or the judgment of his peers, nor be compelled in any criminal proceeding to give evidence against himself, nor be put twice in jeopardy for the same offense.

Laws may be enacted providing for the trial of offenses not felonious by a court not of record without a jury, preserving the right of the accused to an appeal to and a trial by jury in some court of record having original criminal jurisdiction. Laws may also provide for juries consisting of less than twelve, but not less than five, for the trial of offenses not felonious, and may classify such cases, and prescribe the number of jurors for each class.

In criminal cases, the accused may plead guilty. If the accused plead not guilty, he may, with his consent and the concurrence of the attorney for the Commonwealth and of the court entered of record, be tried by a smaller number of jurors, or waive a jury. In case of such waiver or plea of guilty, the court shall try the case.

The provisions of this section shall be self-executing.

Cross references.

As to right to jury trial in civil suits, see Va. Const., Art. I, § 11.

For appeals by the Commonwealth, see Va. Const., Art. VI, § 1.

As to time within which an indictment for felony must be tried, see §

19.2-243

.

As to right of accused to testify, see §

19.2-268

.

As to acquittal by jury barring further prosecution, see §§

19.2-292

and

19.2-293

.

Law Review.

For comment on the denial of the privilege against self-incrimination, see 25 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 287 (1968).

For comment, “Right to Court-Appointed Counsel for Misdemeanants in Virginia,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 306 (1970).

For comment on the admissibility of documentary evidence and the right to confrontation, see 12 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 440 (1970).

For article, “Toward Judicial Reform,” see 6 U. Rich. L. Rev. 83 (1971).

For comment entitled, “Jury Trials for Juvenile Delinquents in Virginia,” see 28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 135 (1971).

For article, “Trial by Jury and Speedy Justice,” see 28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 309 (1971).

For article, “State Courts and Constitutional Rights in the Day of the Burger Court,” see 62 Va. L. Rev. 873 (1976).

For article on discovery penalties, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 283 (1981).

For note, “Criminal Procedure and Criminal Law: Virginia Supreme Court Decisions During the 70’s,” see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 585 (1981).

For note on public access to criminal trials, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (1981).

For comment on the prejudicial effects of cameras in the courtroom, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 867 (1982).

For comment on double jeopardy and the Virginia Supreme Court’s approaches to multiple punishment, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 885 (1982).

For note on immediate appeal from counsel disqualification in criminal cases, see 25 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 131 (1983).

For article, “Appeal De Novo in Virginia: An Examination of Its Present Utility,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1149 (1985).

For note, “Commonwealth Right of Appeal in Criminal Proceedings,” see 43 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 295 (1986).

For article, “The Newsman’s Confidential Source Privilege in Virginia,” see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 377 (1988).

For note, “Civil Sanctions and the Double Jeopardy Clause: Applying the Multiple Punishment Doctrine to Parallel Proceedings after United States v. Halper,” see 76 Va. L. Rev. 1251 (1990).

For an article on bifurcated sentencing in noncapital felony cases in Virginia, see 30 U. Rich. L. Rev. 465 (1996).

For a note, “The Supreme Court’s Backwards Proportionality Jurisprudence:
Comparing Judicial Review of Excessive Criminal Punishments and Excessive Punitive Damages Awards,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1249 (2000).

For 2000 survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 749 (2000).

For article, “Improving the Jury System in Virginia: Jury Patriotism Legislation Is Needed,” 11 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 657 (2003).

For casenote and comment, “Danforth v. Minnesota: The Confrontation Clause, Retroactivity, and Federalism,” see 17 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 255 (2009).

For article, “Signaling and Plea Bargaining’s Innocence Problem,” see 66 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 73 (2009).

For annual survey essay, “A Vanishing Virginia Constitution?,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 347 (2011).

For comment, “Commonwealth and Constitution,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 415 (2013).

For article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 49 (2018).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
1A M.J. Actions, § 2;
1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 57, 376;
2A M.J. Argument and Conduct of Counsel, § 9;
2B M.J. Automobiles, § 118;
2C M.J. Autrefois, Acquit and Convict, § 2;
4A M.J. Contempt, § 4C Constitutional Law, §§ 85, 86, 91 - 93, 97, 130, 142;
5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, §§ 23, 25, 33, 38, 40 - 43, 46, 55, 64, 67;
9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, § 25;
9B M.J. Indictments, Informations and Presentments, § 6;
11B M.J. Jury, §§ 3, 4, 20, 32;
19 M.J. Venue, §§ 14, 17;
19 M.J. Verdict, § 7;
20 M.J. Witnesses, §§ 36, 39, 80.

§ 8-A. Rights of victims of crime.

That in criminal prosecutions, the victim shall be accorded fairness, dignity and respect by the officers, employees and agents of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions and officers of the courts and, as the General Assembly may define and provide by law, may be accorded rights to reasonable and appropriate notice, information, restitution, protection, and access to a meaningful role in the criminal justice process. These rights may include, but not be limited to, the following:

§ 9. Prohibition of excessive bail and fines, cruel and unusual punishment, suspension of habeas corpus, bills of attainder, and ex post facto laws.

That excessive bail ought not to be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel and unusual punishments inflicted; that the privilege of the writ of habeas corpus shall not be suspended unless when, in cases of invasion or rebellion, the public safety may require; and that the General Assembly shall not pass any bill of attainder, or any ex post facto law.

Cross references.

As to punishment of attempts to commit crimes, see §§

18.2-25

through

18.2-29

and notes thereto.

Law Review.

For note, “Decency and Fairness: An Emerging Judicial Role in Prison Reform,” see 57 Va. L. Rev. 841 (1971).

For note entitled, “Capital Punishment in Virginia,” see 58 Va. L. Rev. 97 (1972).

For a note, “The Supreme Court’s Backwards Proportionality Jurisprudence:
Comparing Judicial Review of Excessive Criminal Punishments and Excessive Punitive Damages Awards,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1249 (2000).

For 2000 survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 749 (2000).

For 2003/2004 survey of criminal law and procedure, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 133 (2004).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal law and procedure for the year 2007-2008, see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 149 (2008).

For article, “Rethinking Bail Reform,” see 52 U. Rich. L. Rev. 795 (2018).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
2A M.J. Assault and Battery, § 17;
5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 91;
9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, § 4.

§ 10. General warrants of search or seizure prohibited.

That general warrants, whereby an officer or messenger may be commanded to search suspected places without evidence of a fact committed, or to seize any person or persons not named, or whose offense is not particularly described and supported by evidence, are grievous and oppressive, and ought not to be granted.

Cross references.

As to searches and seizures and search warrants under Alcoholic Beverage Control Act, see §§

4.1-337

and

4.1-339

.

For statutory provisions regarding search warrants, see §§

19.2-52

through

19.2-60

.

Law Review.

For note, “Criminal Procedure and Criminal Law: Virginia Supreme Court Decisions During the 70’s,” see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 585 (1981).

For note on stop and frisk based upon anonymous telephone tips, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1437 (1982).

For article, “Unreasonable Searches and Seizures of Papers,” see 71 Va. L. Rev. 869 (1985).

For a case note, “Abrogating the Exclusionary Rule Outside of the Criminal Trial Context? Pennsylvania Board of Probation & Parole v. Scott: One Step Closer To a Per Se Rule in Fourth Amendment Jurisprudence,” see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 631 (1999).

For an article, “Wake Up and Smell the Contraband:
Why Courts That do Not Find Probable Cause Based On Odor Are Wrong,” see 42 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 289 (2000).

For 2000 survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 749 (2000).

For annual survey essay, “A Vanishing Virginia Constitution?,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 347 (2011).

For comment, “Commonwealth and Constitution,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 415 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
4A M.J. Conflict of Laws, Domicile and Residence, § 6;
16 M.J. Searches and Seizures, §§ 2-9.

§ 11. Due process of law; obligation of contracts; taking or damaging of private property; prohibited discrimination; jury trial in civil cases.

That no person shall be deprived of his life, liberty, or property without due process of law; that the General Assembly shall not pass any law impairing the obligation of contracts; and that the right to be free from any governmental discrimination upon the basis of religious conviction, race, color, sex, or national origin shall not be abridged, except that the mere separation of the sexes shall not be considered discrimination.

That in controversies respecting property, and in suits between man and man, trial by jury is preferable to any other, and ought to be held sacred. The General Assembly may limit the number of jurors for civil cases in courts of record to not less than five.

That the General Assembly shall pass no law whereby private property, the right to which is fundamental, shall be damaged or taken except for public use. No private property shall be damaged or taken for public use without just compensation to the owner thereof.
No more private property may be taken than necessary to achieve the stated public use.
Just compensation shall be no less than the value of the property taken, lost profits and lost access, and damages to the residue caused by the taking. The terms “lost profits” and “lost access” are to be defined by the General Assembly.
A public service company, public service corporation, or railroad exercises the power of eminent domain for public use when such exercise is for the authorized provision of utility, common carrier, or railroad services. In all other cases, a taking or damaging of private property is not for public use if the primary use is for private gain, private benefit, private enterprise, increasing jobs, increasing tax revenue, or economic development, except for the elimination of a public nuisance existing on the property. The condemnor bears the burden of proving that the use is public, without a presumption that it is.

Cross references.

As to right to jury trial, see Va. Const., Art. I, § 8.

As to right of eminent domain, see §

25.1-100

et seq.

Amendment ratified November 6, 2012. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2011 Session (Acts 2011, c. 757) and was referred to the 2012 Regular Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 2012, cc. 564, 684, 736 and 738) and submitted to the people November 6, 2012, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “taking or damaging” for “taking” in the catchline; deleted “, nor any law whereby private property shall be taken or damaged for public uses, without just compensation, the term ‘public uses’ to be defined by the General Assembly” in the first sentence; and added the third paragraph.

Law Review.

For note, “Eminent Domain in Virginia — Compensation for Damages and Nonphysical Takings,” see 43 Va. L. Rev. 597 (1957).

For article, “The Preparation and Trial of Condemnation Cases for Virginia Public Service Companies,” see 43 Va. L. Rev. 747 (1957).

For case note on damages for impairment of access to land, see 18 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 138 (1961).

For article on recovery of consequential damages in eminent domain, see 48 Va. L. Rev. 437 (1962).

For article on condemnations of future interests, see 48 Va. L. Rev. 477 (1962).

For article on the condemnation of leasehold interests, see 48 Va. L. Rev. 477 (1962).

For article on loss of access to highways and different approaches to the problem of compensation, see 48 Va. L. Rev. 538 (1962).

For comment on compensation for the right of access to navigable waters, see 26 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 136 (1969).

For article, “A Century of Tort Immunities in Virginia,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 238 (1970).

For article, “Trial by Jury and Speedy Justice,” see 28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 309 (1971).

For comment, “Jury Trials for Juvenile Delinquents in Virginia,” see 28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 135 (1971).

For note entitled, “Capital Punishment in Virginia,” see 58 Va. L. Rev. 97 (1972).

For note on recent decision, “Zoning — Virginia Defines Scope of Local Power to Impose Dedication and Land Use Requirements Upon Individual Landowners — Board of Supervisors v. Rowe,

216 Va. 128

, 216 S.E.2d 199 (1975),” see 10 U. Rich. L. Rev. 440 (1976).

For an analytical comparison of English natural justice and American due process, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 47 (1976).

For note on a constitutional analysis of Virginia’s Medical Malpractice Act, see 37 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1192 (1980).

For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court Decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

For comment on challenging rezoning in Virginia, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 423 (1981).

For note discussing the issues of eminent domain and water allocation as related to coal slurry pipelines, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 789 (1983).

For article on public access to Virginia’s tidelands, see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 669 (1983).

For article, “Benign Racial Classifications: A Guide for Transportation Attorneys,” see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 29 (1984).

For comment, “The New Doctrine of Necessaries in Virginia,” see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 317 (1985).

For article, “Appeal De Novo in Virginia: An Examination of Its Present Utility,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1149 (1985).

For article, “Civil Rights and ‘Personal Injuries’: Virginia’s Statute of Limitations for Section 1983 Suits,” see 26 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 199 (1985).

For note, “Will Tort Reform Combat the Medical Malpractice Insurance Availability and Affordability Problems That Virginia’s Physicians Are Facing,” see 44 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1463 (1988).

For article, “Efficient Compensation for Lost Market Value Due to Fear of Electric Transmission Lines,” see 12 G.M.U. L. Rev. 711 (1990).

For article, “Siting Power Lines in Historic Areas of Virginia,” see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 381 (1995).

For an article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1009 (1998).

For an article relating to a variety of developments in employment law, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1199 (1998).

For a case note, “Knowing Possession vs. Actual Use: Due Process and Social Costs in Civil Insider Trading Actions,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 233 (1999).

For a note, “Pulliam v. Coastal Emergency Services of Richmond, Inc.:
Reconsidering the Standard of Review and Constitutionality of Virginia’s Medical Malpractice Cap,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 587 (2000).

For 2000 survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 749 (2000).

For article, “Improving the Jury System in Virginia: Jury Patriotism Legislation Is Needed,” 11 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 657 (2003).

For 2003/2004 survey of real estate and land use law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2004).

For annual survey essay, “Election of Remedies in the Twenty-First Century: Centra Health, Inc. v. Mullins,” 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 149 (2009).

For note, “Restitution Rollout: The Restatement (Third) of Restitution and Unjust Enrichment: The Restitution Revival and the Ghosts of Equity,” see 68 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1027 (2011).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Land Use and Zoning Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (2012).

For Article, “Why Federal Rule of Evidence 403 is Unconstitutional, and Why it Matters,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1077 (2013).

For article, “The Damagings Clauses,” see 104 Va. L. Rev. 341 (2018).

For article, “Taxation,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 133 (2019).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 24;
4A M.J. Commonwealth’s and State’s Attorney, § 3;
5A M.J. Counties, §§ 53, 86;
5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 43;
7A M.J. Eminent Domain, §§ 2, 17, 29, 32.1, 34, 36, 37, 40, 99;
9B M.J. Housing, § 1;
9B M.J. Husband & Wife, § 21;
11A M.J. Judgments and Decrees, § 219;
11B M.J. Jury, § 3;
12A M.J. Licenses, § 10;
12A M.J. Limitation of Actions, § 2;
12B M.J. Mandamus, § 15;
14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 17;
17 M.J. State, §§ 25, 26;
17 M.J. Statutes, § 73;
19 M.J. Turnpikes and Tollroads, § 4;
20 M.J. Waters and Watercourses, § 27;
21 M.J. Zoning and Planning, § 5.

§ 11-A. Right to work.

Defeat of proposed amendment. —

This section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2015 Regular Session (Acts 2015, c. 717) and was referred to the 2016 Regular Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 2016, cc. 12, 506, 733, 735, and 736) and submitted to the people on November 8, 2016, where it was defeated.

§ 12. Freedom of speech and of the press; right peaceably to assemble, and to petition.

That the freedoms of speech and of the press are among the great bulwarks of liberty, and can never be restrained except by despotic governments; that any citizen may freely speak, write, and publish his sentiments on all subjects, being responsible for the abuse of that right; that the General Assembly shall not pass any law abridging the freedom of speech or of the press, nor the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the government for the redress of grievances.

Law Review.

For article, “A Camera in the Courtroom,” see 22 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1 (1965).

For article, “Free Press and Fair Trial in English Law,” see 22 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 17 (1965).

For comment, “The First Amendment and Commercial Advertising: Bigelow v. Commonwealth,” see 60 Va. L. Rev. 154 (1974).

For article on right of access to government property as a forum for communication, see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (1986).

For article, “The Newsman’s Confidential Source Privilege in Virginia,” see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 377 (1988).

For a symposium, “Aggressive Newsgathering and the First Amendment,” see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1121 (2000).

For an essay, “Privacy and Celebrity: An Essay on the Nationalization of Intimacy,” see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1121 (2000).

For an article, “Protect the Press: A First Amendment Standard for Safeguarding Aggressive Newsgathering,” see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1143 (2000).

For an article, “Ride-alongs, Paparazzi, and Other Media Threats to Privacy,” see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1167 (2000).

For an article, “I Spy: The Newgatherer Under Cover,” see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1185 (2000).

For an article, “Qualified Intimacy, Celebrity, and the Case for a Newgathering Privilege,” see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1233 (2000).

For article summarizing published Virginia criminal law decisions between July 1, 2002 and July 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 87 (2003).

For 2003/2004 survey of criminal law and procedure, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 133 (2004).

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For annual survey essay, “A Vanishing Virginia Constitution?,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 347 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 38;
12A M.J. Libel and Slander, § 3;
18 M.J. Theaters, Shows and Fairs, § 2.

§ 13. Militia; standing armies; military subordinate to civil power.

That a well regulated militia, composed of the body of the people, trained to arms, is the proper, natural, and safe defense of a free state, therefore, the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed; that standing armies, in time of peace, should be avoided as dangerous to liberty; and that in all cases the military should be under strict subordination to, and governed by, the civil power.

Law Review.

For article, “The Right to Bear Arms, A Study in Judicial Misinterpretation,” see 2 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 381 (1960).

For a jurisprudential view of the right to keep and bear arms, see 4 G.M.U. L. Rev. 1 (1981).

For Essay, “Article I, Section 13 of the Virginia Constitution: Of Militias and an Individual Right to Bear Arms,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 215 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
4C Constitutional Law, § 82.

§ 14. Government should be uniform.

That the people have a right to uniform government; and, therefore, that no government separate from, or independent of, the government of Virginia, ought to be erected or established within the limits thereof.

Law Review.

For annual survey essay, “A Vanishing Virginia Constitution?,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 347 (2011).

§ 15. Qualities necessary to preservation of free government.

That no free government, nor the blessings of liberty, can be preserved to any people, but by a firm adherence to justice, moderation, temperance, frugality, and virtue; by frequent recurrence to fundamental principles; and by the recognition by all citizens that they have duties as well as rights, and that such rights cannot be enjoyed save in a society where law is respected and due process is observed.

That free government rests, as does all progress, upon the broadest possible diffusion of knowledge, and that the Commonwealth should avail itself of those talents which nature has sown so liberally among its people by assuring the opportunity for their fullest development by an effective system of education throughout the Commonwealth.

Law Review.

For discussion of the role of state constitutions in education, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 916 (1976).

§ 15-A. (Proposed amendment — see Editor’s note) Marriage.

That only a union between one man and one woman may be a marriage valid in or recognized by this Commonwealth and its political subdivisions.

This Commonwealth and its political subdivisions shall not create or recognize a legal status for relationships of unmarried individuals that intends to approximate the design, qualities, significance, or effects of marriage. Nor shall this Commonwealth or its political subdivisions create or recognize another union, partnership, or other legal status to which is assigned the rights, benefits, obligations, qualities, or effects of marriage.

Proposed amendment.

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2021 Special Session I (Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 517 and 518) and was referred to the 2022 Regular Session. If again agreed to at that session the amendment would read:

“

Section 15-A. Fundamental right to marry.

“That the right to marry is a fundamental right, inherent in the liberty of persons, and marriage is one of the vital personal rights essential to the orderly pursuit of happiness.

“This Commonwealth and its political subdivisions and agents shall issue marriage licenses, recognize marriages, and treat all marriages equally under the law regardless of the sex or gender of the parties to the marriage.

“Religious organizations and clergy acting in their religious capacity shall have the right to refuse to perform any marriage.”

A new section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2005 Session (Acts 2005, cc. 946 and 949) and was referred to the 2006 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 2006, cc. 72, 828, 944 and 947) and submitted to the people on November 7, 2006, when it was ratified. The enactment became effective January 1, 2007.

Law Review.

For note, “Estop in the Name of Love: A Case for Constructive Marriage in Virginia,” see 49 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 973 (2007).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 417 (2007).

For article, “Marriage Equality Comes to the Fourth Circuit,” 75 Wash & Lee L. Rev. 2005 (2018).

§ 16. Free exercise of religion; no establishment of religion.

That religion or the duty which we owe to our Creator, and the manner of discharging it, can be directed only by reason and conviction, not by force or violence; and, therefore, all men are equally entitled to the free exercise of religion, according to the dictates of conscience; and that it is the mutual duty of all to practice Christian forbearance, love, and charity towards each other. No man shall be compelled to frequent or support any religious worship, place, or ministry whatsoever, nor shall be enforced, restrained, molested, or burthened in his body or goods, nor shall otherwise suffer on account of his religious opinions or belief; but all men shall be free to profess and by argument to maintain their opinions in matters of religion, and the same shall in nowise diminish, enlarge, or affect their civil capacities. And the General Assembly shall not prescribe any religious test whatever, or confer any peculiar privileges or advantages on any sect or denomination, or pass any law requiring or authorizing any religious society, or the people of any district within this Commonwealth, to levy on themselves or others, any tax for the erection or repair of any house of public worship, or for the support of any church or ministry; but it shall be left free to every person to select his religious instructor, and to make for his support such private contract as he shall please.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions dealing with religious freedom, see §§

57-1

,

57-2

.

Law Review.

For article on “Virginia Laws Affecting Churches,” see 43 Va. L. Rev. 119 (1957).

For article, “State Courts and Constitutional Rights in the Day of the Burger Court,” see 62 Va. L. Rev. 873 (1976).

For article discussing Virginia laws affecting churches, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

For note, “The Myth of Religious Neutrality by Separation in Education,” see 71 Va. L. Rev. 127 (1985).

For note on enforcing separation of church and state through state constitutional provisions, see 71 Va. L. Rev. 625 (1985).

For article, “State Aid to Religious-Affiliated Schools: A Political Analysis,” see 28 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 119 (1986).

For several articles on religion and the state, see 27 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 833-1109 (1987).

For series of articles on the debate of teaching creationism in public schools and conflicts between creation theory and evolution, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 149, 183, 187 (1988).

For note, “Abolishing ‘Separate But (Un)Equal’ Status For Religious Universities,” see 77 Va. L. Rev. 1231 (1991).

For a lecture, “Religious Liberty at the Stake,” see 84 Va. L. Rev. 459 (1998).

For note, “Church Property and Institutional Free Speech: The Constitutionality of Virginia Code Section

57-9

,” see 95 Va. L. Rev. 1841 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
3C M.J. Colleges & Universities, § 7;
6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony, § 53;
14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 3.

§ 17. Construction of the Bill of Rights.

The rights enumerated in this Bill of Rights shall not be construed to limit other rights of the people not therein expressed.